New Mexico, session 2026, SB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the cultural affairs department for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 through 2029 for the expansion and continuing implementation of the New Mexico historic women marker program. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. .233680.1